South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1081.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - South Carolina Auctioneers' Commission, relating to South Carolina Auctioneers' Commission, designated as Regulation Document Number 5423, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Auctioneers' Commission proposes to add to, amend and/or repeal various sections in Chapter 14 of the Code of Regulations. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 27, 2025. ----XX----